North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-74 Registered Livestock

4.1-74-01.
Registered livestock — Misrepresentation or falsification of records — Penalty.

A person may not willfully:

Sell any livestock with a certificate of registration or breeding that does not pertain to the livestock;

Falsify a certificate of registration or breeding;

Misrepresent or falsify any production or performance information referenced in a certificate of registration;

Change the markings of livestock with the intent of deceiving a purchaser; or

Misrepresent the sire to which livestock has been bred.

A person violating this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a class C felony for a second or subsequent offense.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 3.